Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4913
Educational institution training program, defined.

Educational institution training program means any training program established by or operated by any public or private educational institution that provides training or education for recruits, potential employees, or actual employees of the company, or any combination thereof, with regard to employment or potential employment at the project.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 13.